Arkansas, session 2025, SB8.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION - USED TIRE RECYCLING AND ACCOUNTABILITY
PROGRAM. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Energy and
Environment, to be payable from the Used Tire Recycling Fund, for expenses of
the Department of Energy and Environment - Division of Environmental Quality
- Used Tire Recycling and Accountability Program for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2025, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2024-2025
(01) USED TIRE RECYCLING AND
ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM EXPENSES $5,000,000

*WFP007*
12/06/2024 4:09:41 PM WFP007

SB8
SECTION 2. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. FUNDING
TRANSFER - USED TIRE RECYCLING AND ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM. Immediately upon
the effective date of this act, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall
transfer on his or her books and those of the State Treasurer and the Auditor
of the State the sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) from the General
Revenue Allotment Reserve Fund to the Used Tire Recycling Fund to provide
funds for the appropriation provided herein.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1,
2024 through June 30, 2025.

SECTION 3. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 4. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 5. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the General
Assembly, that funds provided by the General Assembly for the operations of
the Department of Energy And Environment - Division of Environmental Quality
are, due to unforeseen circumstances, insufficient for the Department of
Energy And Environment - Division of Environmental Quality to continue to
provide essential governmental services; that the provisions of this act will
12/06/2024 4:09:41 PM

SB8
provide the necessary monies for the Department of Energy And Environment -
Division of Environmental Quality to continue such services; and that a delay
in the effective date of this Act could work irreparable harm upon the proper
administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore,
an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the
immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in
full force and effect from and after the date of its passage and approval.
If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall
become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the
Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the
veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house
overrides the veto.
























12/06/2024 4:09:41 PM